Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2257
Office; access to governmental records.

Upon request, the office shall have access to any record of a state or local governmental agency which is necessary to carry out its responsibilities under the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Act.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 21.